Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201260-3,148
Commercial motor vehicle; increase
of gross vehicle weight; where allowed.

No owner of a commercial
motor vehicle shall be permitted to increase the gross vehicle weight for
which such commercial motor vehicle is registered except at the office of
the county treasurer in the county where such commercial motor vehicle
is currently registered unless the need for such increase occurs when such
commercial motor vehicle is more than one hundred miles from the county seat
of such county, unless authorized to do so by the Nebraska State Patrol or
authorized state scale examiner as an emergency.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 148;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 82.
July 19, 2012